test/src/morphology/N-aeqbtwks_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - äʼbţõks: # Noun 208 'eng /est vahend/fin' - full paradigm
     äʼbţõks+N+Sg+Nom: äʼbţõks
     äʼbţõks+N+Sg+Gen: äʼbţõks
     äʼbţõks+N+Sg+Par: äʼbţõkst
     äʼbţõks+N+Sg+Dat: äʼbţõksõn
     äʼbţõks+N+Sg+Ins: äʼbţõksõks
     äʼbţõks+N+Sg+Ill: äʼbţõksõ
     äʼbţõks+N+Sg+Ela: äʼbţõksõst
     äʼbţõks+N+Pl+Nom: äʼbţõkst
     äʼbţõks+N+Pl+Gen: äʼbţõkst
     äʼbţõks+N+Pl+Par: äʼbţõkši
     äʼbţõks+N+Pl+Dat: äʼbţõkstõn
     äʼbţõks+N+Pl+Ins: äʼbţõkstõks
     äʼbţõks+N+Pl+Ill: äʼbţõkšiz
     äʼbţõks+N+Pl+Ela: äʼbţõkšist
